Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-3304
Proof of financial responsibility.

Before an automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle may operate on the public roads of this state, a person shall submit proof of financial responsibility satisfactory to the department that the automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle is covered by insurance or proof of self-insurance that satisfies the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 4.

Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, see section 60-569.